Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Task Force on Recycling

§ 49-31-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 10, effective July 1, 2017.

§49-31-41. [Laws, 2004, ch. 536, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§ 49-31-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 404, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

§49-31-43. [Laws, 2004, ch. 536, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

Former 49-31-43 related to Task Force on Recycling duties, election of the chairman, meetings, administration and compensation.